Hawaii statutes.
§8-4 Buddha Day. April 8 of each
year shall be known and designated as "Buddha Day", provided that
this day is not and shall not be construed to be a state holiday. [L 1963, c
162, §1; Supp, §1-43; HRS §8-4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next